Nebraska, session 109, LB371.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 25-3502, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
25-3502 In the Uniform Civil Remedies for Unauthorized Disclosure of
Intimate Images Act:
(1) Consent means affirmative, conscious, and voluntary authorization by
an individual with legal capacity to give authorization.
(2) Depicted individual means an individual whose body is shown in whole
or in part in an intimate image, including by means of computer generation or
digital manipulation.
(3) Disclosure means transfer, publication, or distribution to another
person. Disclose has a corresponding meaning.
(4) Identifiable means recognizable by a person other than the depicted
individual:
(A) from an intimate image itself; or
(B) from an intimate image and identifying characteristic displayed in
connection with the intimate image; or .
(C) from information displayed in connection with an intimate image.
(5) Identifying characteristic means information that may be used to
identify a depicted individual.
(6) Individual means a human being.
(7) Intimate image means a photograph, film, video recording, or other
similar medium that shows:
(A) the uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or female post-pubescent
nipple of a depicted individual; or
(B) a depicted individual engaging in or being subjected to sexual
conduct.
(8) Person means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity,
public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, or other legal entity.
(9) Sexual conduct includes:
(A) masturbation;
(B) genital, anal, or oral sex;
(C) sexual penetration of, or with, an object;
(D) bestiality; or
(E) the transfer of semen onto a depicted individual.
Sec. 2. Section 25-3503, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
25-3503 (a) In this section:
(1) Harm includes physical harm, economic harm, and emotional distress
whether or not accompanied by physical or economic harm.
(2) Private means:
(A) created or obtained under circumstances in which a depicted individual
had a reasonable expectation of privacy; or
(B) made accessible through theft, bribery, extortion, fraud, false
pretenses, voyeurism, or exceeding authorized access to an account, message,
file, device, resource, or property; or .
(C) created by means of computer generation or digital manipulation
without the consent of the depicted individual.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in section 25-3504, a depicted individual
who is identifiable and who suffers harm from a person's intentional disclosure
or threatened disclosure of an intimate image that was private without the
depicted individual's consent has a cause of action against the person if the
person knew or acted with reckless disregard for whether:
(1) the depicted individual did not consent to the disclosure;
(2) the intimate image was private; and
(3) the depicted individual was identifiable.
(c) The following conduct by a depicted individual does not establish by
itself that the individual consented to the disclosure of the intimate image
which is the subject of an action under the Uniform Civil Remedies for
Unauthorized Disclosure of Intimate Images Act or that the individual lacked a
reasonable expectation of privacy:
(1) consent to creation of the image; or
(2) previous consensual disclosure of the image.
(d) A depicted individual who does not consent to the sexual conduct or
uncovering of the part of the body depicted in an intimate image of the
individual retains a reasonable expectation of privacy even if the image was
-1-

LB371 LB371
2025 2025
created when the individual was in a public place.
Sec. 3. Original sections 25-3502 and 25-3503, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-2-